Utah statutes.
41-1a-1002.   Unbranded title -- Prerepair inspections -- Interim repair inspections -- Repair.

(1)  To obtain an unbranded title to a salvage vehicle:

(a)  the vehicle must:

(i)  be a motor vehicle;

(ii) (A)  have an unbranded Utah title or a Utah salvage certificate issued to replace an unbranded Utah title at the time the motor vehicle is inspected under Subsection (1)(a)(iii); or

(B)  have an unbranded title from another jurisdiction and the motor vehicle shall have been damaged in Utah as evidenced by an accident report;

(iii)  be inspected by a certified vehicle inspector prior to any repairs on the motor vehicle following any major damage; and

(iv)  have major damage in no more than one major component part;

(b)  the major damage identified by a certified vehicle inspector under Subsection (1)(a) must be repaired in accordance with standards established by the Motor Vehicle Enforcement Division;

(c)  any interim inspection required by a certified vehicle inspector must be completed in accordance with the directions of the initial certified vehicle inspector and to the satisfaction of the interim certified vehicle inspector; and

(d)  the owner must apply to the Motor Vehicle Enforcement Division for authorization to obtain an unbranded title under Section 41-1a-1003.

(2)  A flood damaged motor vehicle does not qualify for an unbranded title.

(3)  A salvage vehicle that is seven years old or older at the time of application for unbranding does not qualify for an unbranded title.

(4)  The prerepair motor vehicle inspection required under Subsection (1) shall include examination of the motor vehicle and its major component parts to determine:

(a)  the extent and location of the major damage to the motor vehicle;

(b)  that the identification numbers of the vehicle or its parts have not been removed, falsified, altered, defaced, or destroyed; and

(c)  there are no indications that the vehicle or any of its parts are stolen.

(5)  If the certified vehicle inspector determines in an inspection under Subsection (1) that the motor vehicle has major damage:

(a)  in more than one major component part, the certified vehicle inspector shall notify the Motor Vehicle Enforcement Division and the owner that the motor vehicle does not qualify for an unbranded title; or

(b)  requiring repair or replacement in one or no major component part he shall:

(i)  record on the vehicle damage disclosure statement the:

(A)  date of the inspection;

(B)  description of the motor vehicle including its vehicle identification number, make, model, and year of manufacture;

(C)  owner of the motor vehicle and name of the lienholder, if any, shown on the salvage certificate; and

(D)  major damage to the motor vehicle requiring repair or replacement;

(ii)  indicate that the motor vehicle may qualify for an unbranded title if the major damage is repaired or the damaged part is replaced;

(iii)  sign the vehicle damage disclosure statement and attest to the information's accuracy;

(iv)  indicate whether an interim inspection of the motor vehicle damage repairs is required and which repairs require inspection prior to completion of repair work;

(v)  give to the owner a copy of the vehicle damage disclosure statement and deliver or mail a copy of the statement to the lienholder, if any, shown on the salvage certificate; and

(vi)  file the original vehicle damage disclosure statement with the Motor Vehicle Enforcement Division.

(6) (a)  Upon receipt by the Motor Vehicle Enforcement Division of notification from a certified vehicle inspector that a motor vehicle has had a prerepair inspection, the Motor Vehicle Enforcement Division shall make a record of the inspection.

(b)  Any subsequent prerepair inspections shall be disregarded by the Motor Vehicle Enforcement Division in evaluating the major damage to the motor vehicle and the repairs required.

(7)  A person who repairs or replaces major damage identified by a certified vehicle inspector on a motor vehicle in accordance with Subsection (1) shall:

(a)  record on the vehicle damage disclosure statement:

(i)  a description of the repairs made to the motor vehicle including how they were made; and

(ii)  his signature following the repair description with an attestation that the description is accurate;

(b)  obtain the signature of the certified vehicle inspector who performs an interim inspection, attesting that the repairs identified for interim inspection were satisfactorily completed;

(c)  file the original vehicle damage disclosure statement containing the repair information with the Motor Vehicle Enforcement Division; and

(d)  give a copy of the vehicle damage disclosure statement to the owner.



Amended by Chapter 324, 2010 General Session

